Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1151.
do enact as follows:AB1151,11Section 1. 196.027 (1) (d) 3. of the statutes is created to read:AB1151,2,32196.027 (1) (d) 3. The retiring of any existing electric generating facility 3fueled by nonrenewable combustible energy resources.AB1151,24Section 2. 196.027 (1) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1151,2,135196.027 (1) (f) “Environmental control cost” means capital cost, including 6capitalized cost relating to regulatory assets, incurred or expected to be incurred by 7an energy utility in undertaking an environmental control activity and, with 8respect to an environmental control activity described in par. (d) 2. or 3., includes 9the unrecovered value of property that is retired, including any demolition or 10similar cost that exceeds the salvage value of the property. “Environmental control 11cost” does not include any monetary penalty, fine, or forfeiture assessed against an 12energy utility by a government agency or court under a federal or state 13environmental statute, rule, or regulation.AB1151,2,1414